dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/venetan.aff
FLAG long
# sostantivi/ajetivi alterai — demenutivi ko èle vanesente (-eto)
SFX e1 Y 52
SFX e1 0 to/M2 e	ds:eto
SFX e1 e iti e	ds:eto is:plural	# metafonèxi
SFX e1 è eeto/M2 è	ds:eto
SFX e1 è eiti è	ds:eto is:plural	# metafonèxi
SFX e1 0 eto/M2 n	ds:eto
SFX e1 0 iti n	ds:eto is:plural	# metafonèxi
SFX e1 ía ieta/F2 [aeiou]ía	ds:eto
SFX e1 ía ïeta/F2 [^aeiou]ía	ds:eto
SFX e1 èr ereto/M2 èr	ds:eto
SFX e1 èr eriti èr	ds:eto is:plural	# metafonèxi
SFX e1 òr oreto/M2 òr	ds:eto
SFX e1 òr oriti òr	ds:eto is:plural	# metafonèxi
SFX e1 a eta/F2 [^dgíkƚnrtx]a	ds:eto
SFX e1 o eto/M2 [^cjɉkƚmst]o	ds:eto
SFX e1 o iti [^cjɉkƚmst]o	ds:eto is:plural	# metafonèxi
SFX e1 0 eto/M2 [^èò]r	ds:eto
SFX e1 0 iti [^èò]r	ds:eto is:plural	# metafonèxi
SFX e1 èda edeta/F2 èda	ds:eto
SFX e1 èga egeta/F2 èga	ds:eto
SFX e1 èƚa eƚeta/F2 èƚa	ds:eto
SFX e1 òka oketa/F2 òka	ds:eto
SFX e1 òƚa oƚeta/F2 òƚa	ds:eto
SFX e1 òna oneta/F2 òna	ds:eto
SFX e1 èra ereta/F2 èra	ds:eto
SFX e1 òta oteta/F2 òta	ds:eto
SFX e1 òxa oxeta/F2 òxa	ds:eto
SFX e1 òco oceto/M2 òco	ds:eto
SFX e1 òco ociti òco	ds:eto is:plural	# metafonèxi
SFX e1 òjo ojeto/M2 òjo	ds:eto
SFX e1 òjo ojiti òjo	ds:eto is:plural	# metafonèxi
SFX e1 òɉo oɉeto/M2 òɉo	ds:eto
SFX e1 òɉo oɉiti òɉo	ds:eto is:plural	# metafonèxi
SFX e1 òko oketo/M2 òko	ds:eto
SFX e1 òko okiti òko	ds:eto is:plural	# metafonèxi
SFX e1 èƚo eƚeto/M2 èƚo	ds:eto
SFX e1 èƚo eƚiti èƚo	ds:eto is:plural	# metafonèxi
SFX e1 òƚo oƚeto/M2 òƚo	ds:eto
SFX e1 òƚo oƚiti òƚo	ds:eto is:plural	# metafonèxi
SFX e1 òmo ometo/M2 òmo	ds:eto
SFX e1 òmo omiti òmo	ds:eto is:plural	# metafonèxi
SFX e1 òso oseto/M2 òso	ds:eto
SFX e1 òso ositi òso	ds:eto is:plural	# metafonèxi
SFX e1 a eta/F2 [^èò]ƚa	ds:eto
SFX e1 a eta/F2 [^òr]na	ds:eto
SFX e1 a eta/F2 [^è]rna	ds:eto
SFX e1 a eta/F2 [^ò][ktx]a	ds:eto
SFX e1 o eto/M2 [^èò]ƚo	ds:eto
SFX e1 o iti [^èò]ƚo	ds:eto is:plural	# metafonèxi
SFX e1 o eto/M2 [^ò][kst]o	ds:eto
SFX e1 o iti [^ò][kst]o	ds:eto is:plural	# metafonèxi
SFX e1 a eta/F2 [^è][dgr]a	ds:eto
SFX e1 èrna erneta/F2 èrna	ds:eto

# sostantivi/ajetivi alterai — demenutivi (-eta)
SFX e2 Y 68
SFX e2 o eta/F2 [^bdđkèíjɉnñsŧvúx]o	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 o eta/F2 [^ò][bdknñ]o	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 o eta/F2 [^èò][sŧ]o	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 o eta/F2 [^è][đjɉxv]o	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 èo eeta/F2 èo	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 èđo eđeta/F2 èđo	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 èjo ejeta/F2 èjo	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 èɉo eɉeta/F2 èɉo	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 èso eseta/F2 èso	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 èŧo eŧeta/F2 èŧo	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 èxo exeta/F2 èxo	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 èvo eveta/F2 èvo	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 òbo obeta/F2 òbo	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 òdo odeta/F2 òdo	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 òko oketa/F2 òko	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 òno oneta/F2 òno	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 òño oñeta/F2 òño	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 òso oseta/F2 òso	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 òŧo oŧeta/F2 òŧo	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 0 ta/F2 e	ds:eto
SFX e2 ío ieta/F2 [aeiou]ío	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 ío ïeta/F2 [^aeiou]ío	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 úo ueta/F2 [aeiou]úo	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 úo üeta/F2 [^aeiou]úo	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 0 eta/F2 [^èò]l	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 èl eleta/F2 èl	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 òl oleta/F2 òl	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 0 eta/F2 [^è]r	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 èr ereta/F2 èr	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 0 eta/F2 n	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e2 a eta/F2 [^bcdđfkgíjɉlpmnñrstŧx]a	ds:eto
SFX e2 a eta/F2 [^è][r]a	ds:eto
SFX e2 a eta/F2 [^èò][bdđgklpsŧx]a	ds:eto
SFX e2 a eta/F2 [^ò][cfjɉmñt]a	ds:eto
SFX e2 a eta/F2 [^òr]na	ds:eto
SFX e2 ía ieta/F2 [aeiou]ía	ds:eto
SFX e2 ía ïeta/F2 [^aeiou]ía	ds:eto
SFX e2 èba ebeta/F2 èba	ds:eto
SFX e2 èda edeta/F2 èda	ds:eto
SFX e2 èđa eđeta/F2 èđa	ds:eto
SFX e2 èka eketa/F2 èka	ds:eto
SFX e2 èga egeta/F2 èga	ds:eto
SFX e2 èla eleta/F2 èla	ds:eto
SFX e2 èpa epeta/F2 èpa	ds:eto
SFX e2 èra ereta/F2 èra	ds:eto
SFX e2 èsa eseta/F2 èsa	ds:eto
SFX e2 èŧa eŧeta/F2 èŧa	ds:eto
SFX e2 èxa exeta/F2 èxa	ds:eto
SFX e2 òba obeta/F2 òba	ds:eto
SFX e2 òca oceta/F2 òca	ds:eto
SFX e2 òda odeta/F2 òda	ds:eto
SFX e2 òđa ođeta/F2 òđa	ds:eto
SFX e2 òfa ofeta/F2 òfa	ds:eto
SFX e2 òga ogeta/F2 òga	ds:eto
SFX e2 òka oketa/F2 òka	ds:eto
SFX e2 òja ojeta/F2 òja	ds:eto
SFX e2 òɉa oɉeta/F2 òɉa	ds:eto
SFX e2 òla oleta/F2 òla	ds:eto
SFX e2 òma ometa/F2 òma	ds:eto
SFX e2 òna oneta/F2 òna	ds:eto
SFX e2 òña oñeta/F2 òña	ds:eto
SFX e2 òpa opeta/F2 òpa	ds:eto
SFX e2 òsa oseta/F2 òsa	ds:eto
SFX e2 òta oteta/F2 òta	ds:eto
SFX e2 òŧa oŧeta/F2 òŧa	ds:eto
SFX e2 òxa oxeta/F2 òxa	ds:eto
SFX e2 a eta/F2 [^è]rna	ds:eto
SFX e2 èrna erneta/F2 èrna	ds:eto

# sostantivi/ajetivi alterai — demenutivi ko èle vanesente (-eta)
SFX e3 Y 26
SFX e3 0 ta/F2 e	ds:eto
SFX e3 o eta/F2 [^ƚ]o	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e3 o eta/F2 [^èò]ƚo	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e3 èƚo eƚeta/F2 èƚo	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e3 òƚo oƚeta/F2 òƚo	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e3 0 eta/F2 n	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e3 0 eta/F2 [^è]r	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e3 èr ereta/F2 èr	is:femenine ds:eto
SFX e3 a eta/F2 [^dgíkƚnñtx]a	ds:eto
SFX e3 a eta/F2 [^è][dg]a	ds:eto
SFX e3 a eta/F2 [^èò]ƚa	ds:eto
SFX e3 a eta/F2 [^ò][kt]a	ds:eto
SFX e3 a eta/F2 [^òr][nñx]a	ds:eto
SFX e3 ía ieta/F2 [aeiou]ía	ds:eto
SFX e3 ía ïeta/F2 [^aeiou]ía	ds:eto
SFX e3 èda edeta/F2 èda	ds:eto
SFX e3 èga egeta/F2 èga	ds:eto
SFX e3 èƚa eƚeta/F2 èƚa	ds:eto
SFX e3 òka oketa/F2 òka	ds:eto
SFX e3 òƚa oƚeta/F2 òƚa	ds:eto
SFX e3 òna oneta/F2 òna	ds:eto
SFX e3 òña oñeta/F2 òña	ds:eto
SFX e3 òta oteta/F2 òta	ds:eto
SFX e3 òxa oxeta/F2 òxa	ds:eto
SFX e3 a eta/F2 [^è]rna	ds:eto
SFX e3 èrna erneta/F2 èrna	ds:eto


# sostantivi/ajetivi alterai — demenutivi (-èl/-èla)
SFX eL Y 38
SFX eL e èl/M0M2B1Pv e	ds:èl
SFX eL 0 èl/M0M2B1Pv [ln]	ds:èl
SFX eL òr orèl/M0M2B1Pv òr	ds:èl
SFX eL a èla/F2 [^cdjɉklnprstŧúv]a	ds:èl
SFX eL o èl/M0M2B1Pv [^cdíjɉòpstŧv]o	ds:èl
SFX eL 0 èl/M0M2B1Pv [^ò]r	ds:èl
SFX eL úa uèla/F2 [aeiou]úa	ds:èl
SFX eL úa üèla/F2 [^aeiou]úa	ds:èl
SFX eL ío ièl/M0M2B1Pv [aeiou]ío	ds:èl
SFX eL ío ïèl/M0M2B1Pv [^aeiou]ío	ds:èl
SFX eL òo oèl/M0M2B1Pv [aeiou]òo	ds:èl
SFX eL òo oèl/M0M2B1Pv [^aeiou]òo	ds:èl
SFX eL òca ocèla/F2 òca	ds:èl
SFX eL òda odèla/F2 òda	ds:èl
SFX eL òja ojèla/F2 òja	ds:èl
SFX eL òɉa oɉèla/F2 òɉa	ds:èl
SFX eL èka ekèla/F2 èka	ds:èl
SFX eL òka okèla/F2 òka	ds:èl
SFX eL òla olèla/F2 òla	ds:èl
SFX eL òna onèla/F2 òna	ds:èl
SFX eL òpa opèla/F2 òpa	ds:èl
SFX eL òra orèla/F2 òra	ds:èl
SFX eL òsa osèla/F2 òsa	ds:èl
SFX eL òta otèla/F2 òta	ds:èl
SFX eL òŧa oŧèla/F2 òŧa	ds:èl
SFX eL òva ovèla/F2 òva	ds:èl
SFX eL òco ocèl/M0M2B1Pv òco	ds:èl
SFX eL òjo ojèl/M0M2B1Pv òjo	ds:èl
SFX eL òɉo oɉèl/M0M2B1Pv òɉo	ds:èl
SFX eL òdo odèl/M0M2B1Pv òdo	ds:èl
SFX eL òpo opèl/M0M2B1Pv òpo	ds:èl
SFX eL òso osèl/M0M2B1Pv òso	ds:èl
SFX eL òto otèl/M0M2B1Pv òto	ds:èl
SFX eL òŧo oŧèl/M0M2B1Pv òŧo	ds:èl
SFX eL òvo ovèl/M0M2B1Pv òvo	ds:èl
SFX eL a èla/F2 [^èò][jɉk]a	ds:èl
SFX eL a èla/F2 [^ò][cdlnprstŧv]a	ds:èl
SFX eL o èl/M0M2B1Pv [^ò][cdjɉpstŧv]o	ds:èl
