dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/venetan.dic
parejin/M0M2F0F3Bue0e2	po:adjective_qualificative
spañuòƚo/M2F0F3e1e3	po:adjective_qualificative
lengua/F2aZaSeLe7e2iN	po:noun is:femenine
ƚivra/F2e3	po:noun is:femenine
mesetadura/F2d0e2	po:noun is:femenine
gròsa/F2eLe7Cu	po:adjective_qualificative is:femenine
fradèƚo/M2a1e1iN	po:noun
kar/M0M2eLe7	po:noun
bataɉa/F2e2	po:noun is:femenine
donsèƚo/M2e1e3	po:noun
fuxo/M2A0eLe7e0	po:noun
kavaƚo/M2a1aLe1e3iNoLuLr0	po:noun
kòxa/F2aZaSe2	po:noun is:femenine
ƚusèrna/F2e3	po:noun is:femenine
muƚo/M2aLe1e3oL	po:adjective_qualificative
òjo/M2A0aTaZaSeLe7o0o2o4Cu	po:noun st:òco
skritura/F2e2	po:noun is:femenine al:skirtura
peloxa/F2eL	po:adjective_qualificative is:femenine
gran/M0M2BueLe7e0iNuZuS	po:noun
konseɉèr/M0M2F0F3Bue0e2*0	po:noun st:konseɉo
staƚa/F2e3	po:noun is:femenine
viŧina/F2eL	po:noun is:femenine
kuarèƚo/M2e1	po:noun st:kuadro ds:èl
piñata/F2aZaSeLe7iNuZuS	po:noun is:femenine
martèƚo/M2e1iN	po:noun
graŧia/F2e2-1	po:noun is:femenine
kaxo/M2A0aZaSeLe7e0i0iNoTr0	po:noun
maƚatía/F2e3o1o3	po:noun is:femenine st:maƚato
mïoƚo/M2e1	po:unit_of_measure
putana/F2aZaSeLe7o1o3	po:noun is:femenine
vièjo/M2aTaZaSe0e2iNo0o1o2o3o4oT	po:adjective_qualificative
magro/M2F0F3e0e2	po:adjective_qualificative
marina/F2aZaSeLe7	po:adjective_qualificative is:femenine
manđa/F2e2oT*0	po:noun is:femenine
mastèƚo/M2F0F3e1e3o7o2o4	po:noun
peƚisa/F2e3r0	po:noun is:femenine
fortuna/F2aZaSeLe7-1*0	po:noun is:femenine
leđièr/M0M2e0e2iN*0	po:adjective_qualificative
kontadina/F2aTaZaSeLe7oTCu	po:adjective_qualificative is:femenine
anpoƚa/F2e3iN	po:noun is:femenine
ganba/F2aTaZaSe2iNo1o3oT	po:noun is:femenine
kuƚo/M2a1aLe1o7o1o2o3o4oL	po:noun
ƚadro/M2F0F3e1e3r0	po:noun
spinoxo/M2F0F3A0e0e2	po:adjective_qualificative st:spin ds:oxo
alŧana/F2eL	po:noun is:femenine
kanpanèƚa/F2e3iN	po:noun is:femenine
ƚatin/M0M2F0F3Bue1e3	po:adjective_qualificative
peƚadura/F2d7e3@0+0*0	po:noun is:femenine
vivanda/F2eLe7	po:noun is:femenine
feraƚe/M2e1iNi0Vs	po:noun
gropa/F2eLe7e2	po:noun is:femenine
fosado/M2A0y0eLe7	po:noun st:fòso
kaƚigo/M2aLe1	po:noun
oxièƚo/M2a1aLe1e3iNo7o1o2o3o4	po:noun
sküèla/F2aZaSe2o1o3	po:noun is:femenine
sukuòƚo/M2e1o7o2o4	po:noun st:suka ds:òl
rodèƚa/F2e3iNCi	po:noun is:femenine st:ròda ds:èl
triveƚin/M0M2Bue1	po:noun st:trivèƚo ds:in
gaban/M0M2B1BueLe7iNo0o1o2o3o4oT	po:noun
forfe/F2A0e2	po:noun is:femenine st:fórbeđe
bagatèƚa/F2e3*0	po:noun is:femenine
kojon/M1M2B1BuaTaZaSeLe7e0o0o1o2o3o4	po:adjective_qualificative
moƚexin/M0M2Bue1e3oL	po:adjective_qualificative st:mòƚo ds:in
franđa/F2eLe2	po:noun is:femenine
maƚor/M1M2Bue1	po:noun
baƚordo/M2aLe1e3o7o1o2o3o4	po:adjective_qualificative
fuòɉa/F2aZaSe2*0	po:noun is:femenine
seɉèƚo/M2e1	po:noun st:secèƚo
inbrïaga/F2eLe7oT	po:adjective_qualificative is:femenine
secèƚo/M2e1	po:noun st:seco ds:èl
sopèƚo/M2e1o7o2o4	po:noun
bixato/M2A0eLe7iNoT	po:noun
seraja/F2e2Vs	po:noun is:femenine
bariƚa/F2e3	po:noun is:femenine
ƚeko/M2e1iNm7	po:noun
polastro/M2aTaZaSeLiNo0o1o2o3o4oT	po:noun st:pol
skabèƚo/M2e1	po:noun
kalkadura/F2d0e2+0.0	po:noun is:femenine
paèƚa/F2e3	po:noun is:femenine
speaƚe/M2e1	po:adjective_qualificative
balŧana/F2eL	po:noun is:femenine st:balŧa
jeƚè/e1Vp	po:noun lg:french
vaƚixa/F2e3	po:noun is:femenine
kanbarièr/M0M2F0F3Bue0e2	po:noun
fornièƚo/M2e1	po:noun st:forno ds:èl
gruòpo/M2A0eLe7e0m0o0o2o4	po:noun
ƚexaña/F2e3Vs	po:noun is:femenine
maƚaño/M2e1	po:noun
burla/F2e2iNoT	po:noun is:femenine
xgualdrina/F2eLe7e2	po:noun is:femenine
aƚòka/F2e3	po:adjective_qualificative is:femenine
funeraƚe/M2e1	po:noun
falsadura/F2d0e2	po:noun is:femenine st:falsa
skoƚo/M2e1	po:noun
karòŧa/F2eLe2iN	po:noun is:femenine
ƚetura/F2e3	po:noun is:femenine
kaecòƚo/M2e1	po:noun st:kaeco ds:òl
konđura/F2e2*0	po:noun is:femenine
noa/F2eLe7	po:noun is:femenine
sukòƚo/M2e1o7o2o4	po:noun st:suka ds:òl
xirèƚo/M2F0F3e1e3	po:noun
kaldana/F2eLe7	po:noun is:femenine
fiƚar/M1M2e1	po:noun
butiƚia/F2e3r0	po:noun is:femenine
cuxura/F2e2	po:noun is:femenine
fonda/F2eLe7iN	po:noun is:femenine
sixiƚa/F2e3	po:noun is:femenine
stròpo/M2A0e0eLe7iNo0o2o4	po:noun
vaƚidur/M0M2d7e1	po:noun
ŧupièra/F2e2o1o3Vp	po:noun is:femenine
puƚiar/M0M2e1iNoL	po:noun
puƚiara/F2e3iN	po:noun is:femenine
sora–an/M0M2B1BueLe7	po:noun
kuca/F2e2	po:noun is:femenine
fiƚadura/F2d7e3-1+0.0*0^6^1	po:noun is:femenine
kaƚivo/M2F0F3e1e3	po:adjective_qualificative
piegadura/F2d0e2-1+0.0*0	po:noun is:femenine
badiƚa/F2e3	po:noun is:femenine
mola/F2iNe2	po:adjective_qualificative is:femenine
rudèƚa/F2e3	po:noun is:femenine
maƚuxo/M2F0F3e1e3	po:noun
maƚegrasia/F2e3	po:adjective_qualificative is:femenine
enbrïaga/F2eLe7	po:adjective_qualificative is:femenine
arxenadura/F2d0e2	po:noun is:femenine st:arxenar
despegoƚadura/F2d7e3	po:noun is:femenine
faxioƚo/M2e1o7o1o2o3o4	po:noun
frotaja/F2e2	po:noun is:femenine
kavaƚadura/F2d7e3*0	po:noun is:femenine
kavaŧadura/F2d0e2+0*0	po:noun is:femenine
ƚixier/M0M2e1e3iNoL	po:adjective_qualificative
pisegadura/F2d0e2	po:noun is:femenine st:pisegar
sfregoƚadura/F2d7e3	po:noun is:femenine st:frégoƚa dp:s
sprokadura/F2d0e2	po:noun is:femenine
tringa/F2e2	po:noun is:femenine
